Alabama, session 2026rs, SB264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 11-42-40, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§11-42-40
Any city having 25,000 inhabitants or more, as shown by
the last federal census, from time to time, may extend its
corporate limits in the manner and with the rights, powers,
and privileges as set forth in this article, but the
Page 1

and privileges as set forth in this article, but the
SB264 INTRODUCED
provisions of this article shall not preclude any city from
extending its corporate limits in any other way or manner that
may be authorized by law."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 2